Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.112.060

Sexual misconduct—Settlement agreements.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any provision of a settlement agreement executed subsequent to June 11, 2020, between a postsecondary educational institution and an employee is against public policy and void and unenforceable if the provision prohibits the employee, the institution, a survivor, or any other person from disclosing that the employee has either:

(a) Been the subject of substantiated findings of sexual misconduct; or

(b) Is the subject of an investigation into sexual misconduct that is not yet complete.

(2) A settlement agreement may contain provisions requiring nondisclosure of personal identifying information of persons filing complaints or making allegations and of any witnesses asked to participate in an investigation of the allegations.

(3) Personal identifying information in a settlement agreement that reveals the identity of persons filing complaints or making allegations and of any witnesses asked to participate in an investigation of the allegations is exempt from public disclosure pursuant to RCW 42.56.375.

[ 2020 c 335 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 335: See note following RCW 28B.112.040.